zh-CN: 家具 > 柜子/储物 > 碟片柜/架: 唱片储物筐; 黑胶唱片机支架
pl: Meble > Szafy i przechowywanie > Stojaki na płyty: Skrzynki na płyty winylowe; Stoliki pod gramofon
it: Arredamento > Armadietti e portaoggetti > Scaffali e armadietti per supporti multimediali: Casse per dischi; Supporti per giradischi
th: เฟอร์นิเจอร์ > ตู้และที่จัดเก็บ > ตู้และชั้นจัดเก็บสื่อ: ลังเก็บแผ่นเสียง; ขาตั้งเครื่องเล่นแผ่นเสียง
vi: Đồ gỗ > Tủ và đồ đựng > Tủ và giá để báo, tạp chí, đĩa CD: Thùng lưu trữ đĩa than; Kệ để máy đĩa than
ru: Мебель > Шкафы и мебель для хранения > Шкафы и стеллажи для носителей информации: Ящики для виниловых пластинок; Тумбы для проигрывателей
nl: Meubelen > Kasten en opbergmeubelen > Mediakasten en -rekken: Platenkratten; Platenspelerstandaards
hr-HR: Namještaj > Elementi i pohrana > Ormari i police za pohranu medija: Sanduci za pohranu ploča; Okretni stalci
bg-BG: Мебели > Шкафове и съхранение > Шкафове и стелажи за съхранение на аудио- и видеотехника: Кутии за съхранение на плочи; Стойки за грамофонни системи
cs: Nábytek > Skříně a úložné prostory > Skříňky a přihrádky na mediální nosiče: Přepravky na gramodesky; Stolky pod gramofon
es: Mobiliario > Armarios y almacenamiento > Almacenamiento para CD y DVD: Cajas para guardar discos; Soportes para tocadiscos
pt-BR: Móveis > Armários e armazenamento > Gabinetes e racks para armazenamento de mídia: Caixas para discos de vinil; Suportes para toca-discos
ro-RO: Mobilier > Dulăpioare și spații de depozitare > Dulapuri și rafturi pentru stocare suporturi media: Lăzi de depozitare pentru discuri; Suporturi pentru platane
sk-SK: Nábytok > Úložné skrinky > Skrinky a stojany na médiá: Úložné prepravky na vinylové platne; Stojany pre otočné taniere
ko: 가구 > 캐비닛/수납장 > CD/DVD장: 레코드 보관 크레이트; 턴테이블 스탠드
da: Møbler > Skabe og opbevaring > Medieopbevaring: Opbevaringskasser til plader; Pladespillerborde
fr: Meubles > Armoires et meubles de rangement > Fixations et meubles de rangement multimédia: Caisses de rangement pour vinyles; Meubles pour tourne-disque
pt-PT: Mobiliário > Armários e armazenamento > Armários e estantes de armazenamento multimédia: Caixas para arrumação de discos; Suportes para gira-discos
en: Furniture > Cabinets & Storage > Media Storage Cabinets & Racks: Record Storage Crates; Turntable Stands
nb: Møbler > Skap og lagring > Skap og stativer for medielagring: Lagringskasser for vinylplater; Platespillerstativer
sv: Möbler > Skåp och lagring > Medieförvaring: Skivbackar; Skivspelarbord
fi: Huonekalut > Kaapit ja säilytys > Mediakaapit ja -hyllyt: Vinyylilevylaatikot; Levysoitintasot
hu: Bútor > Szekrények és tárolók > Médiatároló szekrények és állványok: Hanglemeztartó ládák; Lemezjátszó-állványok
sl-SI: Pohištvo > Omare in shranjevanje > Omarice in stojala za shranjevanje medijev: Gajbe za shranjevanje plošč; Vrtljivi podstavki
tr: Mobilyalar > Dolaplar ve Saklama Mobilyaları > Medya Saklama Dolapları ve Rafları: Plak saklama kasaları; Pikap standları
el: Έπιπλα > Ντουλάπια & αποθήκευση > Ντουλάπια & ράφια αποθήκευσης πολυμέσων: Καφάσια αποθήκευσης δίσκων; Βάσεις για πικάπ
lt-LT: Baldai > Spintelės ir sandėliavimas > Spintelės ir lentynos medijai: Plokštelių laikymo dėžės; Patefonų stovai
de: Möbel > Schränke > Mediaaufbewahrung: Schallplattenkisten; Plattenspieler-Ständer
ja: 家具 > 収納家具 > メディア収納家具: レコード収納クレート; ターンテーブルスタンド
zh-TW: 家具 > 櫥櫃和收納 > 視聽櫃/視聽架: 唱片收納箱; 唱片機架